Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.060

Election method—Fixing date of election.

Upon granting the petition under the twenty percent annexation petition under the election method, and after the auditor has certified the petition as being sufficient, the legislative body of the city or town shall indicate to the county auditor its preference for the date of the election on the annexation to be held, which shall be one of the dates for special elections provided under RCW 29A.04.330 that is sixty or more days after the date the preference is indicated. The county auditor shall call the special election at the special election date indicated by the city or town.

[ 2015 c 53 s 24; 1989 c 351 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 6; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.060. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 12; prior: 1907 c 245 s 3, part; RRS s 8898, part.]

NOTES:

Election method, date for annexation election if review board's determination favorable: RCW 35.13.174.